Hawaii statutes.
[§444-36] Prosecution of criminal
violations. The regulated industries complaints office shall report any
criminal violation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, criminal
contempt of court, to the county prosecuting attorney's office or the department
of the attorney general for prompt prosecution. [L 1996, c 172, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next